California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(f) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe any regulations that may be necessary or appropriate to implement the purposes of this section. 

(2) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 679, Sec. 3.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23311.

(a) If a qualified entity, as defined by Section 23310, has been dissolved or canceled as described by Section 23310, but continues to do business within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 23101, or has any remaining assets which were not disclosed by the qualified entity at the time of request for abatement under Section 23310, the total tax, interest, and penalties that were abated pursuant to Section 23310 shall be immediately due and payable. In addition, a penalty
 in an amount equal to 50 percent of the total tax abated pursuant to Section 23310, plus accrued interest payable pursuant to Section 19101 on that amount for the period or periods beginning on the last date prescribed by law for the payment of that tax, determined without regard to extensions, and ending on the date the tax was abated, shall be imposed. 

(b) The penalty imposed by this section is in addition to any other penalty imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(c) Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031) of Chapter 4 of Part 10.2, relating to deficiency assessments, shall not apply with respect to the assessment or collection of any penalty imposed by subdivision (a) or to previously abated tax, interest, and penalties that are due and payable pursuant to this
 section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 679, Sec. 4.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Dissolution or Withdrawal [23331. - 23335.]

23331.

(a) For the purposes of this article, the effective date of dissolution of a corporation is the date on which the certified copy of the court decree, judgment, or order declaring the corporation duly wound up and dissolved is filed in the office of the Secretary of State or the date on which the certificate of winding up, if necessary, and the certificate of dissolution are filed in the office of the Secretary of State. For the purposes of this article, the effective date of withdrawal of a foreign corporation is the date on which the certificate of withdrawal is filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

(b) The Secretary of State
 shall, through an information program and by forms and instructions provided to taxpayers, recommend that all documents required by this article to be filed with the Secretary of State be sent, if mailed, by certified mail with return receipt requested. The Secretary of State shall also provide the taxpayers a filing response within 21 days of receipt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 131.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23332.

(a) Except in the case of a taxpayer subject to the provisions of Section 23222a, any taxpayer which is dissolved or withdraws from the state during any taxable year shall pay a tax only for the months of the taxable year which precede the effective date of the dissolution or withdrawal, according to or measured by (1) the net income of the preceding income year or (2) a percentage of net income
 determined by ascertaining the ratio which the months of the taxable year, preceding the effective date of dissolution or withdrawal, bears to the months of the income year, whichever is the lesser amount. The taxes levied under this chapter shall not be subject to abatement or refund because of the cessation of business or corporate existence of any taxpayer pursuant to a reorganization, consolidation, or merger (as defined by Section 23251). In any event, each corporation shall pay a tax not subject to offset for the period in an amount equal to the minimum tax prescribed by Section 23153.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) shall be applied only with respect to taxpayers which dissolve or withdraw before January 1, 1973. On and after that date, the tax for the taxable year in which the taxpayer ceases doing business, dissolves, or withdraws shall be determined under the appropriate provisions of Section 23151.1, 23153, 23181, or 23183,
 whichever is applicable.

(c) (1) A corporation shall not be subject to the minimum franchise tax imposed by this chapter for a taxable year if the corporation does all of the following:

(A) Files a timely final franchise tax return for a taxable year with the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) Does not do business in this state after the end of the taxable year for which the final franchise tax return was filed.

(C) (i) In the case of a corporation other than a corporation described in clause (ii), files a certificate of dissolution or surrender with the Secretary of State, in accordance with Sections 1809, 1905, 2112, 6615, 8615, and 12635 of the Corporations Code and Section 3126 of the Financial Code, before the end
 of the 12-month period beginning with the date the final franchise tax return was filed.

(ii) In the case of a limited liability company that is a corporation pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 23038, files a certificate of cancellation with the Secretary of State, in accordance with Section 17707.02 or 17708.07 of the Corporations Code, before the end of the 12-month period beginning with the date the final franchise tax return was filed.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, a “final franchise tax return” is a return filed pursuant to Section 18601 on or before the due date of the return, as extended, that the taxpayer designates in the manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board as the taxpayer’s final franchise tax return for purposes of the tax imposed under this chapter. A final franchise tax return for purposes of the tax imposed under this chapter is a return filed
 pursuant to Section 18601 where the taxpayer is not required to file a subsequent return to reflect the imposition of tax under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 29.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

23332.5.

If a financial corporation ceases doing business, dissolves, or withdraws from the state during any taxable year, the tax for the taxable year during which cessation of doing business, dissolution or withdrawal occurs shall be computed as prescribed by subdivision (b) or (d) of Section 23183, 23183.1, or 23183.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

23333.

(a) A taxpayer subject to Section 23186 shall, if it dissolves or withdraws prior to the date the rate is determined under Section 23186, pay a tax under Section 23332 at the maximum rate prescribed by Section 23186. If the rate is subsequently determined to be less than the maximum prescribed by Section 23186, a refund shall, within 30 days of that determination, be made as prescribed by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 19301) of Part 10.2.

(b) That part of the tax thus determined which is in excess of the rate specified in Section 23151 shall be collected as a demand for second installment under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 19001) of Part 10.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 37.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

23335.

(a) Any return filed pursuant to Section 18601 that the taxpayer designates in the appropriate place on the form provided by the Franchise Tax Board as the taxpayer’s final franchise tax return as the result of a dissolution or withdrawal shall be treated as a request for information on how to properly dissolve or withdraw.

(b) If a taxpayer has filed a return as described in subdivision (a), the Franchise Tax Board shall provide the taxpayer with information regarding all
 documents that are required by this article to be filed with the Franchise Tax Board and the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 57.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Affiliated Railroads [23361. - 23364a.]

23361.

“Affiliated group” means one or more chains of corporations connected through stock ownership with a common parent corporation if during the period when the income was accrued or realized and on the 16th day of the first month after the close of the taxable year—

(a) At least 80 percent of the stock of each of the corporations, except the common parent corporation, is owned directly by one or more of the other corporations; and

(b) The common parent corporation owns directly at least 80 percent of the stock of at least one of the other corporations; and

(c) Each of the corporations except the common parent corporation is either (1) a corporation whose principal business is that of a common carrier by railroad or (2) a corporation the assets of which consist principally of stock in such corporations and which does not itself operate a business other than that of a common carrier by railroad. For the purpose of determining whether the principal business of a corporation is that of a common carrier by railroad, if a common carrier by railroad has leased its railroad properties and such properties are operated as such by another common carrier by railroad, the business of receiving rents for such railroad properties shall be considered as the business of a common carrier by railroad.

The provisions of this section
 shall not preclude the application of Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101) of this part.

Except in paragraph (c), “stock” does not include nonvoting stock which is limited and preferred as to dividends.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23362.

An affiliated group, subject to the provisions of this article, shall have the privilege of making a consolidated return for the taxable year in lieu of separate returns. The making of a consolidated return shall be upon the condition that all the corporations, which have been members of the affiliated group at any time during the taxable year for which the return is made, consent to all regulations under Section 23363 prescribed prior to the making of such return and the making of a consolidated return shall be considered as such consent. In the case of a
 corporation, which is a member of the affiliated group for a fractional part of the taxable year, the consolidated return shall include the income of such corporation for such part of the taxable year as it is a member of the affiliated group. In the case of a common parent company which is not itself a common carrier by railroad the consolidated return shall include on a consolidated-return basis only the income received from affiliates which are common carriers by railroad.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 63.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23363.

The Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe such regulations as it may deem necessary in order that the tax liability of any affiliated group of corporations making a consolidated return and of each corporation in the group, both during and after the period of affiliation, may be determined, computed, assessed, collected, and adjusted in such manner as to reflect the proper income.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 374.)
-------------------------------------------

23364.

If a consolidated return is made subject to the provisions of this article, the tax imposed under this chapter shall be computed as a unit upon the consolidated net income of the group except as hereinafter provided. The parent corporation and each subsidiary, a member of the group during any part of a consolidated period, shall be severally liable for the tax, including any deficiency in respect thereof, computed upon the consolidated net income of the group. If a subsidiary by reason of a bona fide sale of stock for fair value has ceased to be a member of the affiliated group, its liability shall remain unchanged, except that if such cessation occurred prior to the
 date upon which any such deficiency is assessed, such deficiency, in the case of such former subsidiary, shall be reduced to an amount equal to such part as may be allocable to it upon the basis of the consolidated net income properly assignable to it. In no case, however, shall any demand for the payment of any deficiency be made, or any proceeding in court for the collection thereof be begun against such former subsidiary prior to the determination by the Franchise Tax Board that the amount of the deficiency cannot be collected from the parent corporation and the corporations, if any, remaining members of the affiliated group.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

23364a.

Where a member of an affiliated group filing a consolidated return is a corporation commencing to do business in this state for the first time after August 27, 1937, its tax for the taxable year of commencement shall be the tax for such year as provided for in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 23151.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 552.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Alternative Minimum Tax [23400. - 23459.]

23400.

(a) For the purpose of this chapter, Part VI of Subchapter A of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to alternative minimum tax, shall apply as it read on January 1, 2015, except as otherwise provided.

(b) A corporation electing under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 23800) to be treated as an “S corporation” shall not be subject to the tax imposed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 76.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23453.

(a) There shall be allowed as a credit against the regular tax (as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 23455), for any taxable year, an amount equal to the minimum tax credit for that taxable year.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the minimum tax credit shall be determined in accordance with Section 53 of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided in this part.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, the amount determined under Section 53(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be the regular tax as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 23455, reduced by the sum of the credits
 allowable under this part other than any credit which reduces the tax below the tentative minimum tax, as defined by Section 23455.

(d) Section 53(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the application to applicable corporations, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 77.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23455.

For purposes of this part, Section 55 of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(a) Section 55(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the amount of tentative minimum tax, is modified by requiring the tentative minimum tax for the taxable year to be imposed as follows:

(1) With respect to corporations subject to tax under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101), other than banks or financial corporations, according to or measured by net income, for the privilege of doing business within this state, at a rate of 7 percent upon the basis of so much of the alternative minimum taxable income
 for the taxable year as exceeds the exemption amount.

(2) With respect to corporations subject to tax under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501), on net income from sources within this state, at a rate of 7 percent upon the basis of so much of the alternative minimum taxable income for the taxable year as exceeds the exemption amount.

(3) With respect to organizations or trusts subject to tax under Article 2 (commencing with Section 23731) of Chapter 4, on the unrelated business income from sources within this state, at a rate of 7 percent upon the basis of so much of the alternative taxable income for the taxable year as exceeds the exemption amount.

(4) With respect to banks subject to tax under Section 23181, according
 to or measured by net income, for the privilege of doing
 business within this state, in an amount equal to the sum of the following:

(A) At a rate of 7 percent upon the basis of so much of the alternative minimum taxable income as exceeds the exemption amount.

(B) At the rate determined under Section 23186, less the rate prescribed by Section 23151, upon the basis of net income for the taxable year.

(5) With respect to financial corporations subject to tax under Section 23183, according to or measured by net income, for the privilege of doing business within this state, in an amount equal to the sum of the following:

(A) At a rate of 7 percent upon the basis of so much of the alternative
 minimum taxable income as exceeds the exemption amount.

(B) At the rate determined under Section 23186, less the rate prescribed by Section 23151, upon the basis of net income for the taxable year.

(b) Section 55(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the definition of alternative minimum taxable income, is modified as follows:

(1) For corporations whose net income is determined under Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101), alternative minimum taxable income shall be allocated and apportioned in the same manner as net income is allocated and apportioned for purposes of the regular tax.

(2) With respect to taxpayers subject to Article 4
 (commencing with Section 23221) of Chapter 2, Article 4 (commencing with Section 23221) to Article 9 (commencing with Section 23361), inclusive, shall apply to the tax imposed by this section except that Section 23221 shall not apply.

(3) For purposes of computing the alternative minimum tax for taxable years in which a taxpayer commenced doing business, dissolves, withdraws, or ceases doing business, Sections 18601, 23151, 23151.1, 23151.2, 23181, 23183, 23183.1, 23183.2, 23201 to 23204, inclusive, 23222 to 23224.5, inclusive, 23282, 23332.5, and 23504 shall be applied with due regard for the rate and alternative minimum taxable income prescribed by this chapter.

(c) Section 55(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the definition of regular tax, is modified to
 read:

(1) For purposes of this chapter, “regular tax” means the amount of tax imposed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501) or Article 2 (commencing with Section 23731) of Chapter 4, but does not include any amount imposed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 24667 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 24667.

(2) The tax specified in paragraph (1) shall be the amount determined prior to reduction by any credits against the tax.

(3) The amendments made to Section 55(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code by Section 12001(b)(4) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs
 Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), shall apply.

(d) The rate of 7 percent prescribed in subdivision (a) shall be 6.65 percent for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997. The change in rate provided in this subdivision shall be made without proration otherwise required by Section 24251.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 78.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23455.5.

Section 55(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exemption for small corporations, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 64.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

23456.

For purposes of this part, Section 56 of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(a) (1) Section 56(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to mining exploration and development costs, shall apply only to expenses incurred during taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1988.

(2) Section 56(a)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to pollution control facilities, shall apply only to amounts allowable as a deduction under Section 24372.3.

(b) For purposes of applying Section 56(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, all references to “December
 31, 1986,” are modified to read “December 31, 1987,” and all references to “January 1, 1987,” are modified to read “January 1, 1988.”

(c) Section 56(d)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to include the provisions of Section 25108. 

(d) Section 56(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to
 adjustments based on adjusted current earnings, is modified to provide that for corporations whose income is determined under Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101), adjusted current earnings shall be allocated and apportioned in the same manner as net income is allocated and apportioned for purposes of the regular tax. In addition, each of the following shall apply:

(1) Sections 56(g)(1)(A) and 56(g)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code are modified to provide that the term “adjusted current earnings” means the sum of the adjusted current earnings of that corporation apportionable to this state and the adjusted current earnings allocable to this state.

(2) Section 56(g)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to provide that the term “alternative minimum taxable
 income” means the sum of the alternative minimum taxable income of that corporation apportionable to this state and the alternative minimum taxable income allocable to this state.

(e) Section 56(g)(4)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to provide the following:

(1) In the case of any property placed in service on or after January 1, 1981, and prior to January 1, 1987, other than residential rental property for which an election was made under former Section 24349.5, the amount allowable as depreciation or amortization with respect to that property shall be the same amount that would have been allowable for the taxable year had the taxpayer depreciated the property under the straight line method for each taxable year of the useful life (determined without regard to
 Section 24354.2) for which the taxpayer has held the property.

(2) In the case of any property placed in service on or after January 1, 1987, and prior to January 1, 1990, other than residential rental property for which an election was made under former Section 24349.5, the amount allowable as depreciation or amortization with respect to that property shall be determined by each of the following:

(A) Taking into account the adjusted basis of that property (as determined for purposes of computing alternative minimum taxable income) as of the close of the last taxable year beginning before January 1, 1990.

(B) Using the straight line method over the remainder of the recovery period applicable to that property under the
 alternative system of Section 168(g) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) The amendments made to paragraph (2) by the act adding this paragraph shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(4) The last sentence of Section 56(g)(4)(A)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall not apply to taxable years beginning before January 1, 1998.

(f) (1) Section 56(g)(4)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to disallowance of items not deductible in computing earnings and profits, shall be modified as follows:

(A) (i) A deduction shall be allowed for amounts allowable as a deduction for purposes of the
 regular tax under Sections 24402, 24410, 24411, and 25106.

(ii) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1990, a deduction shall be allowed for amounts allowable as a deduction to a credit union for purposes of the regular tax under Section 24405.

(B) Section 56(g)(4)(C)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for certain dividends, shall not be applicable.

(C) Section 56(g)(4)(C)(iii) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of taxes on dividends from 936 corporations, shall not be applicable.

(D) Section 56(g)(4)(C)(iv) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for certain dividends received by
 certain cooperatives, shall not be applicable.

(2) Section 56(g)(4)(D)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to specify that Sections 24364 and 24407 shall not apply to expenditures paid or incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(3) With respect to corporations that are not subject to the tax imposed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101), the amount of interest income included in the adjusted current earnings shall not exceed the amount of interest income included for purposes of the regular tax.

(4) Appropriate adjustments shall be made to limit deductions from adjusted current earnings for interest expense in accordance with the provisions of Sections 24344 and
 24425.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 79.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23456.5.

Section 56A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to adjusted financial statement income, shall not apply.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 82.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23457.

For purposes of this part, Section 57 of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(a) Section 57(a)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax-exempt interest, shall not be applicable.

(b) Section 57(a)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to accelerated depreciation or amortization on certain property placed in service before January 1, 1987, is modified to read: With respect to each property as described in
 Section 1250(c) of the Internal Revenue Code as that provision read on April 1, 1970, the amount by which the deduction allowable for the taxable year for exhaustion, wear, tear, obsolescence, or amortization exceeds the depreciation deduction that would have been allowable for the taxable year, had the taxpayer depreciated the property under the straight line method for each taxable year of its useful life (determined without regard to Section 24354.2 or 24381) for which the taxpayer has held the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 488, Sec. 8.5.   Effective September 12, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

23459.

For purposes of this part, the provisions of Section 59 of the Internal Revenue Code are modified as follows:

(a) Section 59(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the alternative minimum tax foreign tax credit, shall not be applicable. 

(b) Section 59(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to income eligible for the credit under Section 936 of the Internal Revenue Code, shall not be applicable. 

(c) Subparagraphs (A), (B),
 and (C) of Section 59(e)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified expenditures, are modified to refer to: 

(1) Section 24364, in lieu of the deduction under Section 173 of the Internal Revenue Code. 

(2) Section 24423, in lieu of the deduction under Section 263(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 117, Sec. 50.   Effective July 16, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. The Corporation Income Tax [23501. - 23561.]



  ARTICLE 1. Imposition of Tax [23501. - 23504.]

23501.

(a) There shall be imposed upon every corporation, other than a bank, for each taxable year, a tax at the rate of 7.6 percent upon its net income derived from sources within this state on or after January 1, 1937, other than income for any period for which the corporation is subject to taxation under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101), according to or measured by its net income.

(b) For calendar or fiscal years ending after June 30, 1973, the rate of tax shall be 9
 percent instead of 7.6 percent as provided by subdivision (a).

(c) For calendar or fiscal years ending after December 31, 1979, the rate of tax shall be the rate specified for those years by Section 23151.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

23503.

There shall be offset against the tax hereby imposed for any period the amount of any tax imposed on the taxpayer under Chapter 2 for the same period. In the event that taxes, interest and penalties have been or shall be assessed against, paid by or collected from a taxpayer under this chapter, which assessment, payment or collection should have been made under Chapter 2, such taxes, interest and penalties shall be considered as having been assessed, paid or collected under Chapter 2 as of the date or dates they were made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 557.)
-------------------------------------------

23504.

Where a corporation formerly subject to tax under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101) becomes subject to tax under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501), the tax for the year in which the change occurs will be assessed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101) and not under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501). For years subsequent to the year in which the change occurs, the tax will be assessed under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1304.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Cessation of Activities [23561. - 23561.]

23561.

No decree of dissolution shall be made and entered by any court, nor shall the county clerk of any county or the Secretary of State file any such decree, or file any other document by which the term of existence of any taxpayer shall be reduced or terminated, nor shall the Secretary of State file any certificate of the surrender by a foreign corporation of its right to do intrastate business in this State if the corporate powers, rights, and privileges of the corporation have been suspended or forfeited by the Franchise Tax Board for failure to pay the tax,
 penalties, or interest due under this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 58.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Tax Credits [23608. - 23698.3.]

23608.

(a) In the case of a taxpayer who transports any agricultural product donated in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 58501) of Part 1 of Division 21 of the Food and Agricultural Code, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1996, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “tax” (as defined by Section 23036), an amount equal to 50 percent of the transportation costs paid or incurred by the taxpayer in connection with the transportation of that donated agricultural product.

(b) If two or more taxpayers share in the expenses eligible for the credit provided by this section, each taxpayer shall be eligible to receive the tax credit in proportion to its respective share of the expenses paid or incurred.

(c) If any credit allowed by this section is claimed by the taxpayer, any deduction otherwise allowed under this part for that amount of the cost paid or incurred by the taxpayer which is eligible for the credit that is claimed shall be reduced by the amount of the credit allowed.

(d) Upon delivery of the donated agricultural product by a taxpayer authorized to claim a credit pursuant to subdivision (a), the nonprofit charitable organization shall provide a certificate to the taxpayer who transported the agricultural product. The certificate shall contain a statement signed and dated by a
 person authorized by that organization that the product is donated under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 58501) of Part 1 of Division 21 of the Food and Agricultural Code. The certificate shall also contain the following information: the type and quantity of product donated, the distance transported, the name of the transporter, the name of the taxpayer donor, and the name and address of the donee. Upon the request of the Franchise Tax Board, the taxpayer shall provide a copy of the certification to the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) In the case where any credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following year, and succeeding years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23609.

For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1987, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “tax” (as defined by Section 23036) an amount determined in accordance with Section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to credit for increasing research activities, except as follows:

(a) For each taxable year beginning before January 1, 1997, both of the following modifications shall apply:

(1) The reference to “20 percent” in Section 41(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “8 percent.”

(2) The reference to “20 percent” in Section 41(a)(2) of the Internal
 Revenue Code is modified to read “12 percent.”

(b) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997, and before January 1, 1999, both of the following modifications shall apply:

(A) The reference to “20 percent” in Section 41(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “11 percent.”

(B) The reference to “20 percent” in Section 41(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “24 percent.”

(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1999, and before January 1, 2000, both of the following shall apply:

(A) The reference to “20 percent” in
 Section 41(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “12 percent.”

(B) The reference to “20 percent” in Section 41(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “24 percent.”

(3) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, both of the following shall apply:

(A) The reference to “20 percent” in Section 41(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “15 percent.”

(B) The reference to “20 percent” in Section 41(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “24 percent.”

(c) (1) With respect to any expense paid or incurred after the operative
 date of Section 6378, Section 41(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified research expenses, is modified to exclude from the definition of “qualified research expense” any amount paid or incurred for tangible personal property that is eligible for the exemption from sales or use tax provided by Section 6378.

(2) “Qualified research” and “basic research” shall include only research conducted in California.

(d) The provisions of Section 41(e)(7)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be modified so that “basic research,” for purposes of this section, includes any basic or applied research including scientific inquiry or original investigation for the advancement of scientific or engineering knowledge or the improved effectiveness of commercial products, except
 that the term does not include any of the following:

(1) Basic research conducted outside California.

(2) Basic research in the social sciences, arts, or humanities.

(3) Basic research for the purpose of improving a commercial product if the improvements relate to style, taste, cosmetic, or seasonal design factors.

(4) Any expenditure paid or incurred for the purpose of ascertaining the existence, location, extent, or quality of any deposit of ore or other mineral (including oil and gas).

(e) (1) In the case of a taxpayer engaged in any biopharmaceutical research activities that
 are described in codes 2833 to 2836, inclusive, or any research activities that are described in codes 3826, 3829, or 3841 to 3845, inclusive, of the Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) Manual published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 1987 edition, or any other biotechnology research and development activities, the provisions of Section 41(e)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified to include both of the following:

(A) A qualified organization as described in Section 170(b)(1)(A)(iii) of the Internal Revenue Code and owned by an institution of higher education as described in Section 3304(f) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) A charitable research hospital owned by an organization that is described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
 Code, is exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, is not a private foundation, is designated a “specialized laboratory cancer center,” and has received Clinical Cancer Research Center status from the National Cancer Institute.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision:

(A) “Biopharmaceutical research activities” means those
 activities that use organisms or materials derived from organisms, and their cellular, subcellular, or molecular components, in order to provide pharmaceutical products for human or animal therapeutics and diagnostics. Biopharmaceutical activities make use of living organisms to make commercial products, as opposed to pharmaceutical activities that make use of chemical compounds to produce commercial products.

(B) “Other biotechnology research and development activities” means research and development activities consisting of the application of recombinant DNA technology to produce commercial products, as well as research and development activities regarding pharmaceutical delivery systems designed to provide a measure of control over the rate, duration, and site of pharmaceutical delivery.

(f) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following year, and succeeding years if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.

(g) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1998, the reference to “Section 501(a)” in Section 41(b)(3)(C)(ii)(I) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified research consortium, is modified to read “this part or Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001).”

(h) (1) (A) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, and before January 1, 2025, the election of alternative incremental credit under Section 41(c)(4) of the Internal
 Revenue Code, as applicable for state purposes, shall apply as that section was in effect on January 1, 2015, and as modified as follows:

(i) The reference to “3 percent” in Section 41(c)(4)(A)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “one and forty-nine hundredths of one percent.”

(ii) The reference to “4 percent” in Section 41(c)(4)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “one and ninety-eight hundredths of one percent.”

(iii) The reference to “5 percent” in Section 41(c)(4)(A)(iii) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “two and forty-eight hundredths of one percent.”

(B) Section 41(c)(4)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code shall